Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Domestic Violence and Abuse

403.710.
Protective orders by Court. [Repealed.]

403.715.
Interpretation of KRS 403.715 to 403.785.

KRS

403.715

to

403.785

shall be interpreted to:

Allow victims to obtain effective, short-term protection against further wrongful conduct in order that their lives may be as secure and as uninterrupted as possible;

Expand the ability of law enforcement officers to effectively respond to further wrongful conduct so as to prevent future incidents and to provide assistance to the victims;

(3)

Provide peace officers with the authority to immediately apprehend and charge for violation of an order of protection any person whom the officer has probable cause to believe has violated an order of protection and to provide courts with the authority to conduct contempt of court proceedings for these violations;

(4)

Provide for the collection of data concerning incidents of domestic violence and abuse in order to develop a comprehensive analysis of the numbers and causes of such incidents; and

(5)

Supplement and not repeal or supplant any duties, responsibilities, services, or penalties under KRS Chapters 209, 209A, and 620.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 152, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 172, § 1, effective July 14, 1992; repealed and reenacted by 2015 ch. 102, § 1, effective January 1, 2016.

403.720.
Definitions for KRS 403.715 to 403.785.

As used in KRS

403.715

to

403.785

:

“Domestic animal” means a dog, cat, or other animal that is domesticated and kept as a household pet, but does not include animals normally raised for agricultural or commercial purposes;

“Domestic violence and abuse” means:

Physical injury, serious physical injury, stalking, sexual abuse, strangulation, assault, or the infliction of fear of imminent physical injury, serious physical injury, sexual abuse, strangulation, or assault between family members or members of an unmarried couple; or

Any conduct prohibited by KRS

525.125

,

525.130

,

525.135

, or

525.137

, or the infliction of fear of such imminent conduct, taken against a domestic animal when used as a method of coercion, control, punishment, intimidation, or revenge directed against a family member or member of an unmarried couple who has a close bond of affection to the domestic animal;

“Family member” means a spouse, including a former spouse, a grandparent, a grandchild, a parent, a child, a stepchild, or any other person living in the same household as a child if the child is the alleged victim;

“Foreign protective order” means any judgment, decree, or order of protection which is entitled to full faith and credit pursuant to 18

U.S.C. sec. 2265

that was issued on the basis of domestic violence and abuse;

“Global positioning monitoring system” means a system that electronically determines a person’s location through a device worn by the person which does not invade his or her bodily integrity and which transmits the person’s latitude and longitude data to a monitoring entity;

“Member of an unmarried couple” means each member of an unmarried couple which allegedly has a child in common, any children of that couple, or a member of an unmarried couple who are living together or have formerly lived together;

“Order of protection” means an emergency protective order or a domestic violence order and includes a foreign protective order;

“Strangulation” refers to conduct prohibited by KRS

508.170

and

508.175

, or a criminal attempt, conspiracy, facilitation, or solicitation to commit the crime of strangulation; and

“Substantial violation” means criminal conduct which involves actual or threatened harm to the person, family, or property, including a domestic animal, of an individual protected by an order of protection.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 152, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 258, § 4, effective July 15, 1988; 1992, ch. 172, § 2, effective July 14, 1992; 2010, ch. 170, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 102, § 2, effective January 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 183, § 3, effective June 27, 2019; 2021 ch. 175, § 4, effective April 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 158, § 1, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/15/2010). 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 170, sec. 20, provides that the amendments made to KRS

15.334

,

403.720

,

403.735

,

403.740

,

403.750

,

431.005

,

431.517

,

431.518

,

431.520

,

533.030

, and

533.250

and the creation of KRS

67.372

,

67.374

,

403.741

,

403.743

,

403.747

,

403.761

,

403.762

, and

511.085

in that Act shall be known as the “Amanda Ross Domestic Violence Prevention Act.”

403.725.
Petition for order of protection — Venue — Verified contents — Concurrent jurisdiction — Protocols for access and supplemental jurisdiction — Referral.

A petition for an order of protection may be filed by:

A victim of domestic violence and abuse; or

An adult on behalf of a victim who is a minor otherwise qualifying for relief under this subsection.

The petition may be filed in the victim’s county of residence or a county where the victim has fled to escape domestic violence and abuse.

The petition shall be verified and contain:

The name, age, address, occupation, residence, and school or postsecondary institution of the petitioner;

The name, age, address, occupation, residence, and school or postsecondary institution of the person or persons who have engaged in the alleged act or acts complained of in the petition;

The facts and circumstances which constitute the basis for the petition;

The date and place of the marriage of the parties, if applicable; and

The names, ages, and addresses of the petitioner’s minor children, if applicable.

The petition shall be filed on forms prescribed by the Administrative Office of the Courts and provided to the person seeking relief by the circuit clerk or by another individual authorized by the court to provide and verify petitions in emergency situations, such as law enforcement officers, Commonwealth’s or county attorneys, and regional rape crisis centers or domestic violence shelters.

All petitions requested, completed, and signed by persons seeking protection under this chapter shall be accepted and filed with the court.

Jurisdiction over petitions filed under this chapter shall be concurrent between the District Court and Circuit Court and a petition may be filed by a petitioner in either court, except that a petition shall be filed in a family court if one has been established in the county where the petition is filed.

The Court of Justice shall provide a protocol for twenty-four (24) hour access to orders of protection in each county with any protocol, whether statewide or local, being subject to Supreme Court review and approval of the initial protocol and any subsequent amendments. This protocol may allow for petitions to be filed in or transferred to a court other than those specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

The Court of Justice may authorize by rule that petitions in a specific county be filed in accordance with a supplemental jurisdictional protocol adopted for that county. This protocol may provide for petitions to be filed in or transferred to a court other than those specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection.

In addition to the protocols for twenty-four (24) hour access established under paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, before January 1, 2019, the Court of Justice shall provide protocols for filing, including electronic filing, of petitions for orders of protection at those regional rape crisis centers designated under KRS

211.600

, or regional domestic violence shelters designated under KRS

209A.045

, that elect to participate in any county’s twenty-four (24) hour access protocol.

These protocols shall be subject to Supreme Court review for approval of the initial protocol and any subsequent amendments.

Any judge to whom a petition is referred under subsection (6) of this section shall have full authority to review and hear a petition and subsequently grant and enforce an order of protection.

If the judge of a court in which there is a pending request for modification or enforcement of an existing order of protection is unavailable or unable to act within a reasonable time, the proceedings may be conducted by any judge of the county in accordance with court rules.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 152, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 172, § 3, effective July 14, 1992; 1992, ch. 414, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 99, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 2015 ch. 102, § 3, effective January 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 115, § 6, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/14/2018). Pursuant to
2018 Ky. Acts ch. 115, sec. 12, that Act shall be known as the Women's Dignity in the Justice System Act. This statute was amended in Section 6 of that Act.

403.730.
Immediate review of petition — Summons to evidentiary hearing — Ex parte emergency protective order.

The court shall review a petition for an order of protection immediately upon its filing. If the review indicates that domestic violence and abuse exists, the court shall summons the parties to an evidentiary hearing not more than fourteen (14) days in the future. If the review indicates that such a basis does not exist, the court may consider an amended petition or dismiss the petition without prejudice.

Service of the summons and hearing order under this subsection shall be made upon the adverse party personally and may be made in the manner and by the persons authorized to serve subpoenas under Rule 45.03 of the Rules of Civil Procedure. A summons may be reissued if service has not been made on the adverse party by the fixed court date and time.

If the review under this section also indicates the presence of an immediate and present danger of domestic violence and abuse, the court shall, upon the filing of the petition, issue ex parte an emergency protective order that:

Authorizes relief appropriate to the situation utilizing the alternatives set out in KRS

403.740

, other than awarding temporary support or counseling;

Sets forth which communications, if any, as requested by the petitioner, are authorized and which communications are unauthorized;

Allows either party to retrieve his or her personal belongings from the parties’ shared residence and directs law enforcement to assist, if requested;

Expires upon the conclusion of the evidentiary hearing required by this section unless extended or withdrawn by subsequent order of the court; and

Does not order or refer the parties to mediation unless requested by the petitioner, and the court finds that:

The petitioner’s request is voluntary and not the result of coercion; and

Mediation is a realistic and viable alternative to or adjunct to the issuance of an order sought by the petitioner.

Nothing in this paragraph shall be interpreted to place any restriction or restraint on the petitioner.

If an order is not issued under this subsection, the court shall note on the petition, for the record, any action taken or denied and the reason for it.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 152, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 172, § 4, effective July 14, 1992; 2015 ch. 102, § 4, effective January 1, 2016; 2022 ch. 143, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

403.735.
Hearing on petition for order of protection — Criteria to assess appropriate relief and sanctions — Continuance of hearing and emergency protective order.

Prior to or at a hearing on a petition for an order of protection:

The court may obtain the respondent’s Kentucky criminal and protective order history and utilize that information to assess what relief and which sanctions may protect against danger to the petitioner or other person for whom protection is being sought, with the information so obtained being provided to the parties in accordance with the Rules of Civil Procedure; and

If the petitioner or respondent is a minor, the court shall inquire whether the parties attend school in the same school system to assist the court in imposing conditions in the order that have the least disruption in the administration of education to the parties while providing appropriate protection to the petitioner.

If the adverse party is not present at the hearing ordered pursuant to KRS

403.730

and has not been served, a previously issued emergency protective order shall remain in place, and the court shall direct the issuance of a new summons for a hearing set not more than fourteen (14) days in the future. If service has not been made on the adverse party before that hearing or a subsequent hearing, the emergency protective order shall remain in place, and the court shall continue the hearing and issue a new summons with a new date and time for the hearing to occur, which shall be within fourteen (14) days of the originally scheduled date for the continued hearing. The court shall repeat the process of continuing the hearing and reissuing a new summons until the adverse party is served in advance of the scheduled hearing. If service has not been made on the respondent at least seventy-two (72) hours prior to the scheduled hearing, the court may continue the hearing no more than fourteen (14) days in the future. In issuing the summons, the court shall simultaneously transmit a copy of the summons or notice of its issuance and provisions to the petitioner.

The provisions of this section permitting the continuance of an emergency protective order shall be limited to six (6) months from the issuance of the emergency protective order. If the respondent has not been served within that period, the order shall be rescinded without prejudice. Prior to the expiration of the emergency protective order, the court shall provide notice to the petitioner stating that, if the petitioner does not file a new petition, the order shall be rescinded without prejudice.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 152, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 172, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 99, § 14, effective July 15, 1996; 2010, ch. 170, § 19, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 102, § 5, effective January 1, 2016.

403.737.
Forms for documents entered into Law Information Network of Kentucky. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 99, § 3, effective July 15, 1996; 2007, ch. 85, § 306, effective June 26, 2007; repealed by 2015 ch. 102, § 51, effective January 1, 2016.

403.740.
Domestic violence order — Restrictions — Temporary child support — Expiration and reissuance.

Following a hearing ordered under KRS

403.730

, if a court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that domestic violence and abuse has occurred and may again occur, the court may issue a domestic violence order:

Restraining the adverse party from:

Committing further acts of domestic violence and abuse;

Any unauthorized contact or communication with the petitioner or other person specified by the court;

Approaching the petitioner or other person specified by the court within a distance specified in the order, not to exceed five hundred (500) feet;

Going to or within a specified distance of a specifically described residence, school, or place of employment or area where such a place is located; and

Disposing of or damaging any of the property of the parties;

Authorizing, at the request of the petitioner:

Limited contact or communication between the parties that the court finds necessary; or

The parties to remain in a common area, which may necessitate them being closer than five hundred (500) feet under limited circumstances with specific parameters set forth by the court.

Nothing in this paragraph shall be interpreted to place any restriction or restraint on the petitioner;

Directing or prohibiting any other actions that the court believes will be of assistance in eliminating future acts of domestic violence and abuse, except that the court shall not order the petitioner to take any affirmative action;

Directing that either or both of the parties receive counseling services available in the community in domestic violence and abuse cases; and

Additionally, if applicable:

Directing the adverse party to vacate a residence shared by the parties to the action;

Utilizing the criteria set forth in KRS

403.270

,

403.320

, and

403.822

, grant temporary custody, subject to KRS

403.315

;

Utilizing the criteria set forth in KRS

403.211

,

403.212

,

403.2121

, and

403.213

, award temporary child support; and

Awarding possession of any shared domestic animal to the petitioner.

In imposing a location restriction described in subsection (1)(a)4. of this section, the court shall:

Afford the petitioner and respondent, if present, an opportunity to testify on the issue of the locations and areas from which the respondent should or should not be excluded;

Only impose a location restriction where there is a specific, demonstrable danger to the petitioner or other person protected by the order;

Specifically describe in the order the locations or areas prohibited to the respondent; and

Consider structuring a restriction so as to allow the respondent transit through an area if the respondent does not interrupt his or her travel to harass, harm, or attempt to harass or harm the petitioner.

When temporary child support is granted under this section, the court shall enter an order detailing how the child support is to be paid and collected. Child support ordered under this section may be enforced utilizing the same procedures as any other child support order.

A domestic violence order shall be effective for a period of time fixed by the court, not to exceed three (3) years, and may be reissued upon expiration for subsequent periods of up to three (3) years each. The fact that an order has not been violated since its issuance may be considered by a court in hearing a request for a reissuance of the order.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 152, § 6, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 172, § 6, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 99, § 16, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 133, § 44, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 170, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 102, § 6, effective January 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 198, § 6, effective July 14, 2018; 2022 ch. 122, § 7, effective July 14, 2022; 2022 ch. 143, § 1, effective July 14, 2022; 2022 ch. 158, § 2, effective July 14, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/14/2022). This statute was amended by 2022 Ky. Acts chs. 122, 143, and 158, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

403.741.
Consideration of respondent’s criminal history and past emergency protective order or domestic violence order required. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 170, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2015 ch. 102, § 51, effective January 1, 2016.

403.743.
Referral of petitioner to county attorney — Duties of county attorney. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 170, § 4, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2015 ch. 102, § 51, effective January 1, 2016.

403.745.
Duration of emergency protective order and domestic violence order — Prohibited costs and conditions — Mutual orders of protection — Amendment — Expungement.

An emergency protective order and a domestic violence order shall become effective and binding on the respondent when the respondent is given notice of the existence and terms of the order by a peace officer or the court or upon personal service of the order, whichever is earlier. A peace officer or court giving notice of an unserved order shall make all reasonable efforts to arrange for the order’s personal service upon the respondent. Once effective, a peace officer or the court may enforce the order’s terms and act immediately upon their violation.

Costs, fees, or bond shall not be assessed against or required of a petitioner for any filing, hearing, service, or order authorized by or required to implement KRS

403.715

to

403.785

.

A court shall not require mediation, conciliation, or counseling prior to or as a condition of issuing an order of protection.

Mutual orders of protection may be issued only if:

Separate petitions have been filed by both parties; and

The orders are written with sufficient specificity to allow any peace officer to identify which party has violated the order.

Upon proper filing of a motion, either party may seek to amend an order of protection.

Testimony offered by an adverse party in a hearing ordered pursuant to KRS

403.730

shall not be admissible in any criminal proceeding involving the same parties, except for purposes of impeachment.

The Court of Justice, county and Commonwealth’s attorneys, law enforcement agencies, and victim services organizations may jointly operate a domestic violence intake center to assist persons who apply for relief under KRS

403.715

to

403.785

.

In cases where criminal conduct is alleged, a court may suggest that a petitioner voluntarily contact the county attorney. A court may not withhold or delay relief if the petitioner elects to not contact the county attorney.

A person’s right to apply for relief under this chapter shall not be affected by that person leaving his or her residence to avoid domestic violence and abuse.

A court shall order the omission or deletion of the petitioner’s address and the address of any minor children from any orders or documents to be made available to the public or to any person who engaged in the acts complained of in the petition.

If a petition under KRS

403.715

to

403.785

did not result in the issuance of a domestic violence order, the court in which the petition was heard may for good cause shown order the expungement of the records of the case if:

Six (6) months have elapsed since the case was dismissed; and

During the six (6) months preceding the expungement request, the respondent has not been bound by an order of protection issued for the protection of any person, including an order of protection as defined in KRS

456.010

.

As used in this subsection, “expungement” has the same meaning as in KRS

431.079

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 152, § 7, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 172, § 7, effective July 14, 1992; 2015 ch. 102, § 7, effective January 1, 2016.

403.747.
Testimony to be given under oath — Consideration of specified areas respondent is to be excluded from. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 170, § 6, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2015 ch. 102, § 51, effective January 1, 2016.

403.750.
Order of protection for family member or member of unmarried couple upon filing of petition or action under KRS Chapter 403.

Any family member or any member of an unmarried couple may file for and receive protection under this chapter from domestic violence and abuse, notwithstanding the existence of or intent to file an action under this chapter by either party.

Any family member or member of an unmarried couple who files a petition for an order of protection based upon domestic violence or abuse shall make known to the court any custody or divorce actions involving both the petitioner and the respondent that are pending in any court.

If the petitioner or respondent to an order of protection initiates an action under this chapter, the party initiating the action shall make known to the court the existence and status of any orders of protection, which shall remain effective and enforceable until superseded by order of the court in which the case is filed.

If a family member or member of an unmarried couple files an action for dissolution of marriage, child custody, or visitation, the court hearing the case shall have jurisdiction to issue an order of protection upon the filing of a verified motion either at the commencement or during the pendency of the action.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 152, § 8, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 418, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 172, § 8, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 99, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; 2004, ch. 133, § 45, effective July 13, 2004; 2010, ch. 170, § 5, effective July 15, 2010; repealed and reenacted by 2015 ch. 102, § 8, effective January 1, 2016.

403.7505.
Certification standards for mental health professionals providing court-mandated treatment — List of certified providers to Administrative Office of the Courts — Collection of data.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall, by administrative regulations promulgated pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A, establish certification standards for mental health professionals providing court-mandated treatment services for domestic violence offenders.

The standards created by the cabinet shall be based on the following principles:

Domestic violence is a pattern of coercive control which includes physical, sexual, psychological, and environmental abuse, and is considered to be criminal conduct;

The primary goal of treatment programs for domestic violence offenders shall be the cessation of violence which will provide for the safety of victims and their children; and

Domestic violence offenders are responsible and shall be held accountable for the violence which they choose to perpetrate.

The standards created by the cabinet shall address the following:

Qualifications of providers of court-mandated domestic violence offender treatment services which shall include appropriate requirements for degree, experience, training, and continuing education;

Procedures for application by providers to receive certification which shall include methods of appeal if certification is denied, and sanctions for noncompliance with the standards which may include revocation of certification;

Admittance and discharge criteria for domestic violence offenders to enter court-mandated treatment services provided pursuant to this section;

Written protocols for referral by a court to certified providers and for progress reports to be made to the court by providers;

Contracts for domestic violence offenders to sign prior to entering court-ordered treatment services provided pursuant to this section. The contract shall specify that certified providers may contact the victims of the offender if the victim chooses to be contacted. The contract shall authorize the provider to release information regarding the offender’s progress in treatment to the court, victims, probation and parole officers, and other individuals authorized by the court to receive the information;

Written procedures in compliance with KRS

202A.400

,

209.030

, and

620.030

;

Payment protocols which require the offender to pay the actual cost for any court-mandated evaluation or treatment pursuant to this section, subject to the offender’s ability to pay; and

Other provisions which shall further the availability and quality of court-mandated domestic violence offender services.

The cabinet shall:

Maintain a list of providers certified pursuant to this section and regularly submit the list to the Administrative Office of the Courts; and

Collect data from certified providers, which shall include demographic information and clinical characteristics on offenders served, number of offenders admitted into treatment and discharge conditions, total clinical services provided to offenders, and other information necessary to monitor the safety and effectiveness of services provided, to be provided upon request.

No person, association, or organization shall conduct, operate, maintain, advise, or advertise any program that provides court-ordered treatment services for domestic violence offenders without first obtaining or maintaining valid certification under this chapter. If the cabinet has cause to believe that court-ordered treatment services for domestic violence offenders are being provided by a person or entity that does not possess valid certification under this chapter, the cabinet may institute proceedings, in the Circuit Court of the county in which the person or entity is located or in Franklin Circuit Court, for injunctive relief to terminate the provision of those services.

Any person certified under this section shall submit quarterly to the cabinet:

Demographic information and clinical characteristics on offenders served;

Number of offenders admitted into treatment and discharge conditions;

Total clinical services provided to offenders; and

Other information as required by administrative regulation.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 54, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 581, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 317, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 70, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 99, § 627, effective June 20, 2005; 2017 ch. 80, § 53, effective June 29, 2017.

403.751.
Entry of summons or order of protection issued pursuant KRS 403.715 to 403.785 into Law Information Network of Kentucky.

All forms, affidavits, and orders of protection issued or filed pursuant to KRS

403.715

to

403.785

which require entry into the Law Information Network of Kentucky shall be entered on forms prescribed by the Administrative Office of the Courts after consultation with the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet. If the provisions of an order of protection are contained in an order which is narrative in nature, the prescribed form shall be used in addition to the narrative order.

The circuit clerk, in cooperation with the court, shall cause a copy of each summons or order issued pursuant to KRS

403.715

to

403.785

, or foreign protective order, fully completed and authenticated pursuant to KRS

403.715

to

403.785

, to be forwarded, by the most expedient means reasonably available and within twenty-four (24) hours following its filing with the clerk, to the appropriate agency designated for entry of orders of protection into the Law Information Network of Kentucky and to the agency assigned service. Any order or court record superseding, modifying, or otherwise affecting the status of an earlier summons or order shall likewise be forwarded by the circuit clerk to the appropriate Law Information Network of Kentucky entering agency and to the agency assigned service, if service is required. The clerk and the court shall comply with all provisions and guidelines of the Law Information Network of Kentucky for entry of the records.

Each agency designated for entry of summonses and orders issued pursuant to KRS

403.715

to

403.785

, or foreign protective orders authenticated pursuant to this chapter, into the Law Information Network of Kentucky shall, consistent with the provisions and guidelines of the Law Information Network of Kentucky, enter the records immediately upon receipt of copies forwarded to the agency in accordance with subsection (2) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 99, § 13, effective July 15, 1996; repealed and reenacted by 2015 ch. 102, § 9, effective January 1, 2016.

403.7521.
Foreign protective orders — Rebuttable presumption of validity — Enforcement — Civil and criminal proceedings mutually exclusive.

All foreign protective orders shall have the rebuttable presumption of validity. The validity of a foreign protective order shall only be determined by a court of competent jurisdiction. Until a foreign protective order is declared to be invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, it shall be given full faith and credit by all peace officers and courts in the Commonwealth.

All peace officers shall treat a foreign protective order as a legal document valid in Kentucky, and shall make arrests for a violation thereof in the same manner as for a violation of an order of protection issued in Kentucky.

The fact that a foreign protective order has not been entered into the Law Information Network of Kentucky shall not be grounds for a peace officer not to enforce the provisions of the order unless it is readily apparent to the peace officer to whom the order is presented that the order has either expired according to a date shown on the order, or that the order’s provisions clearly do not prohibit the conduct being complained of. Officers acting in good faith shall be immune from criminal and civil liability.

If the order has expired or its provisions do not prohibit the conduct being complained of, the officer shall not make an arrest unless the provisions of a Kentucky statute have been violated, in which case the peace officer shall take the action required by Kentucky law.

Civil proceedings and criminal proceedings for violation of a foreign protective order for the same violation of the protective order shall be mutually exclusive. Once either proceeding has been initiated, the other shall not be undertaken, regardless of the outcome of the original proceeding.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 99, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 2015 ch. 102, § 10, effective January 1, 2016.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Temporary Order of Protection — Foreign Protective Affidavit and Order (AOC 275.8), Form 264.05.

403.7524.
Statement to assist out-of-state court in determining whether order issued under KRS 403.715 to 403.785 is entitled to full faith and credit.

In order to assist a court of another state in determining whether an order issued under KRS

403.715

to

403.785

is entitled to full faith and credit pursuant to 18

U.S.C. sec. 2265

:

All domestic violence orders shall include a statement certifying that the issuing court had jurisdiction over the parties and the matter, and that reasonable notice and opportunity to be heard has been given to the person against whom the order is sought sufficient to protect that person’s right to due process; and

All emergency protective orders shall include a statement certifying that notice and opportunity to be heard has been provided within the time required by state law, and in any event within a reasonable time after the order is issued, sufficient to protect the respondent’s due process rights.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall prescribe the form to be used for the purposes of this section.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 99, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 2015 ch. 102, § 11, effective January 1, 2016.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/7/98). The KRS references contained in subsections (1) and (3) of this statute have been codified as those references were enacted in 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 99 (Senate Bill 105), sec. 5, but it appears that these statute references may be erroneous. Subsection (1) contained a reference to Section 1 of the Act (KRS

403.725

), but from context it appears that Section 4 of the Act (KRS

403.7521

) may have been intended; subsection (3) contained a reference to Section 4 of the Act (KRS

403.7521

), but from context it appears that Section 2 of the Act (KRS

403.750

) may have been intended. (Modified to correct a mistaken subsection reference.)